Massachusetts, session 194th, S951.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 45 the following section:-
Section 46. (a) Each public institution of higher education that provides housing for
students shall establish a college campus recovery-focused housing program to provide an
alcohol and drug-free environment for students recovering from substance use disorder. This
program shall provide services including, but not limited to, trauma informed on-site counseling,
mentoring, and peer support.
(b) Each public institution of higher education shall provide overdose training to all
students, faculty, and staff and shall make naloxone available for the purpose of treating
overdoses, as appropriate.
of 1